Hawaii statutes.
[§329B-7] Remedies. [(a)] Any person,
agency, or entity that wilfully and knowingly violates any provision of this
chapter shall be fined not less than $1,000 but not more than $10,000 for each
violation as set by the department, plus reasonable court costs and attorney's
fees as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the
aggrieved person. This subsection shall not be construed as limiting the right
of any person or persons to recover actual damages.

(b) In addition to any other enforcement
mechanism allowed by law, any person, agency, or entity that commits, or
proposes to commit, any act in violation of this chapter may be enjoined
therefrom by a court of competent jurisdiction. An action for injunctive
relief under this subsection may be brought by any aggrieved person that will
fairly and adequately represent the interests of the protected class. [L 1990,
c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next